Arkansas statutes. Title 13 Libraries, Archives, and Cultural Resources
Chapter 14

Heritage Trails System Act

Effective Dates.

Identical Acts 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), Nos. 2 and 3, § 128: July 1, 2016.

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

13-14-101. Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Heritage Trails System Act”.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 728, § 1.

13-14-102. Legislative intent.

The purpose of this chapter is to:

(1)

Provide for the increasing outdoor recreational needs of the State of Arkansas;

(2)

Promote the preservation of, public access to, travel within, and enjoyment and appreciation of the open-air, outdoor areas, and historic resources of the state; and

(3)

Recognize the valuable contributions that volunteers and private, nonprofit trail groups have made to the development and maintenance of historic trails by encouraging and assisting volunteer citizen involvement in the planning, development, maintenance, and management of trails.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 728, § 1.

13-14-103. Arkansas heritage trails.

(a)

A heritage trail shall:

(1)(A)

Be a trail or route established by historic use and shall be historically significant as a result of that historic use.

(B)

A route shall not be required to exist as a discernible trail to qualify as a heritage trail, but its location shall be sufficiently known to permit evaluation of historical interest potential;

(2)(A)

Accurately follow the historic route with some deviations as necessary to avoid difficult routing through subsequent development or to enhance the public's enjoyment of the heritage trail.

(B)

Trail segments no longer possible to travel by trail due to subsequent development as motorized transportation routes may be designated and marked as segments that link to the historic trail;

(3)

Be of state or national significance to Arkansas or American history, including without limitation trade, commerce, exploration, migration, settlement, or military campaigns;

(4)

Have a far-reaching effect on broad patterns of American culture, including trails significant to the history of American Indians; and

(5)(A)

Have significant potential for public recreational use or historical interest based on historical interpretation and appreciation, including roadless segments developed as historic trails and at historic sites associated with the trail.

(B)

The presence of recreation potential unrelated to historic appreciation is not sufficient for designation as a heritage trail.

(b)(1)

A heritage trail shall follow as closely as possible and practicable the original trails or routes of travel of state historic significance.

(2)

The purpose of a heritage trail is the identification and protection of the historic route and its historic remnants and artifacts for public use and enjoyment.

(c)

A land-based or water-based component of an historic trail that is on state-owned land and meets the criteria for a heritage trail shall be included as a state-protected component of a heritage trail.

(d)

The Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism shall:

(1)

Administer the provisions of this chapter; and

(2)

Establish a uniform marker for the Arkansas heritage trails system.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 728, § 1; 2019, No. 910, §
5617.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism” for “Department of Parks and Tourism” in the introductory language of (d).

13-14-104. Designation of heritage trails.

(a)

The General Assembly shall identify the trails or categories of trails that are part of the Arkansas heritage trails system.

(b)

The following are designated as heritage trails:

(1)

Butterfield Stage Route, a bifurcated route from the Missouri state line near Pea Ridge, Arkansas, to the Oklahoma state line near Fort Smith and from Memphis to Fort Smith;

(2)

The Southwest Trail from the Missouri border to the Texas border;

(3)

American Indian removal routes designated by the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism, including without limitation land and water routes for Cherokee, Choctaw, Muscogee (Creek), Chickasaw, and Seminole tribes; and

(4)

Civil War troop movement routes designated by the department.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 728, § 1; 2019, No. 910, §
5618.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism” for “Department of Parks and Tourism” in (b)(3).

13-14-105. Studies of prospective heritage trails.

(a)

The Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism, in consultation with the Arkansas State Archives, the Arkansas Historic Preservation Program, and the Arkansas Department of Transportation, shall conduct studies to determine the feasibility of designating additional trails as heritage trails.

(b)

Studies under this section shall include without limitation:

(1)

The proposed route of the trail;

(2)

The areas adjacent to the trail to be utilized for historic purposes;

(3)

The characteristics making the trail worthy of designation as a state heritage trail and its historic significance;

(4)

The current ownership status of the land and the current and potential use of the designated route;

(5)

The plans for developing and maintaining the trail and the potential cost; and

(6)

The anticipated impact of public outdoor recreation use on the preservation of the prospective heritage trail.

(c)

The following routes shall be studied by the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism to determine the feasibility and desirability of designating other trails as heritage trails:

(1)

The Line Road from Van Buren to Evansville;

(2)

The Memphis to Little Rock Road;

(3)

The Rock Roe Landing connection to the Memphis to Little Rock Road from where Rock Roe enters the White River to the Memphis to Little Rock Road;

(4)

The Cadron to Arkansas Post Road;

(5)

The Little Rock to Fort Smith Road section to Potts old place north of Potts Tavern;

(6)

The Little Rock to Fort Smith and Fort Gibson section from Potts to Fort Smith crossing the Arkansas River at Dardanelle;

(7)

The Upper Cut Road;

(8)

The Little Rock to Washington Road;

(9)

The Old Fort Towson Road from Washington to American Indian Territory;

(10)

The Antoine to Fort Towson Road;

(11)

The Ecore Fabre to Washington Route; and

(12)

The Ecore Fabre to Point Chicot Road.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 728, § 1; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 2, § 121; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 3, § 121; 2017, No. 707, § 23; 2019, No. 910, §§
5619, 5620.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Identical Acts 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), Nos. 2 and 3, § 1, provided:

“(a)

The General Assembly finds:

“(1)

State government provides vital functions that impact the lives of Arkansas citizens on a daily basis;

“(2)

While these functions are important, it is equally important to ensure that state government operates efficiently and effectively to eliminate unnecessary spending of tax dollars and provide timely and quality services to Arkansas citizens; and

“(3)

Issues such as the administrative organization of a governmental entity, the appointment structure of a governmental entity's governing board, and extraneous duties assigned to governmental entities hamper the operation of state government and result in unnecessary expenses and delays in the provision of state services.

“(b)

It is the intent of this act to amend provisions of law applicable to certain agencies, task forces, committees, and commission to promote efficiency and effectiveness in the operations of state government as a whole.”

Amendments.

The 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.) amendment by identical acts Nos. 2 and 3
substituted “State Archives” for “History Commission” in (a).

The 2017 amendment substituted “Department of Transportation” for “State Highway and Transportation Department” in (a).

The 2019 amendment substituted “Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism” for “Department of Parks and Tourism” in (a) and the introductory language of (c).